Missouri, session 2026, HB2676.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 558.031, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 558.031, to read as follows:
558.031. 1. A sentence of imprisonment shall commence when a person convicted of
an offense in this state is received into the custody of the department of corrections or other
place of confinement where the offender is sentenced.
2. Such person shall receive credit toward the service of a sentence of imprisonment
for all time in prison, jail or custody after the offense occurred and before the commencement
of the sentence, when the time in custody was related to that offense. This credit shall be
based upon the certification of the sheriff as provided in subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of
section 217.305 and may be supplemented by a certificate of a sheriff or other custodial
officer from another jurisdiction having held the person on the charge of the offense for which
the sentence of imprisonment is ordered.
3. The officer required by law to deliver a person convicted of an offense in this state
to the department of corrections shall endorse upon the papers required by section 217.305
both the dates the offender was in custody and the period of time to be credited toward the
service of the sentence of imprisonment, except as endorsed by such officer.
4. If a person convicted of an offense escapes from custody, such escape shall
interrupt the sentence. The interruption shall continue until such person is returned to the
correctional center where the sentence was being served, or in the case of a person committed
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2676 2
to the custody of the department of corrections, to any correctional center operated by the
department of corrections. An escape shall also interrupt the jail time credit to be applied to a
sentence which had not commenced when the escape occurred.
5. If a sentence of imprisonment is vacated and a new sentence imposed upon the
offender for that offense, all time served under the vacated sentence shall be credited against
the new sentence, unless the time has already been credited to another sentence as provided in
subsection 1 of this section.
6. If a person released from imprisonment on parole or serving a conditional release
term violates any of the conditions of his or her parole or release, he or she may be treated as
a parole violator. If the parole board revokes the parole or conditional release, the paroled
person shall serve the remainder of the prison term and conditional release term, as an
additional prison term, and the conditionally released person shall serve the remainder of the
conditional release term as a prison term, unless released on parole.
7. [Subsection 2 of this section shall be applicable to offenses for which the offender
was sentenced on or after August 28, 2023.] Notwithstanding any other provision of law to
the contrary, credit for time served shall be awarded as provided under subsection 2 of
this section regardless of when an offense occurred. Back credit shall be awarded to any
offender who was in custody prior to August 28, 2023, who did not receive credit toward
the service of a sentence of imprisonment for all time in prison, jail, or custody after an
offense occurred and before the commencement of the sentence, when the time in
custody was related to that offense.
8. The total amount of credit given shall not exceed the number of days spent in
prison, jail, or custody after the offense occurred and before the commencement of the
sentence.
✔